Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
TRANSITION TO DEPARTMENT OF EARLY LEARNING AND CARE
SECTION 1.
 Section 64, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 64.  (1) [ Sections 12 and 13 of this 2021 Act ] ORS 326.432 and 329A.750 , the  amendments
to ORS 131A.360, 131A.365, 183.459,  279A.050, 326.425, 326.430, 326.435, 327.269, 327.274, 329.155,
329.156, 329.165, 329.170, 329.172, 329.175, 329.181, 329.183, 329.185, 329.195, 329.200, 329.219, 329.841,
329.843, 329.845, 329A.010, 329A.120, 329A.135, 329A.250, 329A.261, 329A.712, 336.101,  336.104,
343.465, 343.475, 343.499, 417.781, 417.782, 417.784, 417.788, 417.790, 417.793, 417.795, 417.796, 417.827,
417.829, 419B.005, 433.301, 609.652,  805.205 and 805.207 by sections 11 and 14 to 62 [ of this 2021
Act], chapter 631, Oregon  Laws 2021, and the repeal of ORS 329.145, 329.150, 329.190, 329A.490 and
329A.493 by section 63 [of this  2021 Act] , chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021,  become operative on
[January] July 1, 2023.
(2) Notwithstanding  the operative date set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the Early
Learning Division and the Department of  Education may take any action before the operative date
set forth in subsection (1) of this section that is necessary for  the Department of Early Learning
and Care to exercise, on and after the operative date set  forth in subsection (1) of this section, all
of the duties, functions and powers conferred on the Department of Early Learning and Care  by
[sections 12 and 13 of this 2021 Act, ] ORS 326.432 and 329A.750  and the amendments  to ORS
131A.360, 131A.365, 183.459, 279A.050, 326.425, 326.430,  326.435, 327.269, 327.274, 329.155, 329.156,
329.165, 329.170, 329.172, 329.175, 329.181, 329.183, 329.185, 329.195, 329.200, 329.219, 329.841, 329.843,
329.845, 329A.010, 329A.120, 329A.135, 329A.250, 329A.261, 329A.712, 336.101, 336.104,  343.465,
343.475, 343.499, 417.781, 417.782, 417.784, 417.788, 417.790, 417.793, 417.795, 417.796, 417.827, 417.829,
419B.005, 433.301, 609.652, 805.205 and 805.207 by sections 11 and 14 to 62 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter
631, Oregon Laws 2021 .
(3) For the purpose of ensuring that the Department of Early  Learning and Care may exercise,
on and after the operative  date set forth in subsection (1) of this section, all of the duties, functions
and powers conferred on the Department of  Early Learning and Care by [ sections 12 and 13 of this
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 1
2021 Act ] ORS 326.432 and 329A.750 and the amendments to ORS 131A.360, 131A.365, 183.459,
279A.050, 326.425, 326.430, 326.435,  327.269, 327.274, 329.155, 329.156, 329.165, 329.170, 329.172,
329.175, 329.181, 329.183, 329.185, 329.195, 329.200, 329.219, 329.841,  329.843, 329.845, 329A.010,
329A.120, 329A.135, 329A.250, 329A.261, 329A.712, 336.101, 336.104, 343.465,  343.475, 343.499, 417.781,
417.782, 417.784, 417.788, 417.790, 417.793, 417.795,  417.796, 417.827, 417.829, 419B.005, 433.301,
609.652, 805.205 and 805.207 by  sections 11 and 14 to 62 [ of this 2021 Act ], chapter 631, Oregon
Laws 2021, the Early Learning Division  and the Department of Education shall develop and imple-
ment a plan that provides for a seamless transfer of duties, functions and powers.
(4) The Governor shall resolve any disputes related to  the plan developed and implemented un-
der subsection (3) of this section, and the Governor’s decision is final.
TRUE COST OF EMPLOYMENT RELATED DAY CARE
SECTION 2.  Section 10, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 10.  (1) No later than July 1, [ 2022] 2023, the Early Learning Council shall establish  by rule
a process by which  to determine the true cost of child care compared to the market rate cost  for
purposes of the Employment Related Day Care subsidy program .
(2) No later than December 31, 2022, the Early Learning Division shall submit a  report to the
appropriate interim committees of the Legislative Assembly on the transition to a rate of re-
imbursement that reflects the true cost of providing care.
CHILD CARE RESOURCE AND REFERRAL SYSTEM
SECTION 3.
 ORS 329A.120 is amended to read:
329A.120. (1) The Office of Child Care shall implement , administer and maintain  the resource
and referral system.
(2) Resource and referral entities must provide services including, but not limited to:
(a) Training and technical assistance for existing and potential child care providers  that in-
cludes, but is  not limited to, coaching, mentoring, consulting and advising on professional develop-
ment;
(b) Referrals for parents or guardians seeking child care providers; or
(c) Recruitment of qualified individuals to meet the child care needs of a community.
SECTION 4.
 ORS 329A.120,  as amended by section 38, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
329A.120. (1) The Department of Early  Learning and Care shall implement , administer and
maintain the resource and referral system.
(2) Resource and referral entities must provide services including, but not limited to:
(a) Training and technical assistance for existing and potential child care providers  that in-
cludes, but is  not limited to, coaching, mentoring, consulting and advising on professional develop-
ment;
(b) Referrals for parents or guardians seeking child care providers; or
(c) Recruitment of qualified individuals to meet the child care needs of a community.
SECTION 5.
 ORS 329A.135 is amended to read:
329A.135. (1) The Office of Child Care shall  implement federal requirements for the resource and
referral system.
(2) The office shall establish  criteria for proposals, prepare requests for proposals, receive pro-
posals and award  grants or enter into agreements [ for the establishment of ] to establish, support,
fund, maintain and expand resource and referral entities.
SECTION 6.  ORS 329A.135,  as amended by section 39, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
329A.135. (1) The Department of Early Learning and Care shall implement  federal requirements
for the resource and referral system.
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 2
(2) The department shall establish criteria  for proposals, prepare requests for proposals, receive
proposals and award grants or  enter into agreements [ for the establishment of ] to establish, sup-
port, fund, maintain and expand  resource and referral entities.
IMPLEMENTATION OF PROHIBITION ON SUSPENSION OR EXPULSION
SECTION 7.  Section 5, chapter 576, Oregon Laws 2021, is amended to read:
Sec. 5.  No later than [ July 1, 2022 ] November 15,  2023, the Early Learning Division must
submit to the appropriate interim committees of the Legislative Assembly a report  on the proposed
implementation of section 3 [ of this  2021 Act ], chapter 576, Oregon Laws 2021 . The report must
include a description of the processes for conducting investigations and contested  case hearings
under ORS chapter 183 for any violations of section 3 [ of this 2021  Act ], chapter 576, Oregon Laws
2021, and must make any related recommendations for legislation.
INFORMATION SHARING WITH STATE AGENCIES
SECTION 8.  ORS 329A.010 is amended to read:
329A.010. (1) There is established within the Early Learning Division the Office of Child Care.
(2)(a) The Office of  Child Care, as designated by the Governor, shall be responsible for admin-
istering funds received by the State of Oregon pursuant to the federal Child  Care and Development
Block Grant Act of 2014, the Child Care and Development  Fund and other federal child care funds
and grants received by the State of Oregon.
(b) Through  the legislative budgeting process, the Legislative Assembly shall identify the portion
of the funds received by the State  of Oregon pursuant to the federal Child Care and Development
Block Grant Act of 2014 to be spent  to provide quality child care, to provide child care subsidies
and for  administrative expenditures. The Office of Child Care shall administer the funds according
to the portions identified by the Legislative Assembly.
(c) The Office of Child Care  shall submit an annual report to the Legislative Fiscal Office re-
garding the expenditures of the funds received  by the State of Oregon pursuant to the federal Child
Care and  Development Block Grant Act of 2014 and the most recent estimate of the balance of the
funds.
(3) The Office of Child Care shall comply with directives of the Early  Learning Council estab-
lished in ORS 326.425 in the office’s implementation of the provisions of ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(4) The Office of Child Care  may maintain information about child care facilities and providers
through electronic records systems.
[(5) The Office of Child Care may share  information with other public entities when the office de-
termines that sharing the information would  support the health or safety of children in child care, ex-
cept as otherwise prohibited by state or federal law. ]
(5) Except as otherwise prohibited by state or federal law, the Office of Child  Care may
share information with:
(a) Other public entities when the office determines that sharing the information would
support the health or safety of children in child care; and
(b) Within the Early Learning Division for purposes of:
(A) Developing a long-range plan for serving children and families, as  provided by ORS
329.165;
(B) Administering preschool programs, as provided by ORS 329.170 to 329.200; and
(C) Implementing policies and  practices related to early childhood professional develop-
ment systems, as provided by ORS 329.219.
(6) There is established in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund, the
Child Care Fund. The Child Care Fund shall consist of moneys collected and  received by the Office
of Child Care pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, ORS 329A.310 and 329A.992  and such mon-
eys as may  be otherwise made available by law. Interest earned on the fund shall be credited to the
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 3
fund. The moneys in the Child Care Fund are appropriated continuously  to the Office of Child Care
and shall be used in a manner consistent with the grant of funds or for  the administration of ORS
181A.200, 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450.
SECTION 9.  ORS 329A.010, as amended by section 37, chapter 631, Oregon  Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
329A.010. (1) There is established within the Department of Early  Learning and Care the Office
of Child Care.
(2) The Office of Child Care shall comply with directives of the Early  Learning Council estab-
lished in ORS 326.425 in the office’s implementation of the provisions of ORS 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(3) The Office of Child Care  may maintain information about child care facilities and providers
through electronic records systems.
[(4) The Office of Child Care may share  information with other public entities when the office de-
termines that sharing the information would  support the health or safety of children in child care, ex-
cept as otherwise prohibited by state or federal law. ]
(4) Except as otherwise prohibited by state or federal law, the Office of Child  Care may
share information with:
(a) Other public entities when the office determines that sharing the information would
support the health or safety of children in child care; and
(b) Within the Department of Early Learning and Care for purposes of:
(A) Developing a long-range plan for serving children and families, as  provided by ORS
329.165;
(B) Administering preschool programs, as provided by ORS 329.170 to 329.200; and
(C) Implementing policies and  practices related to early childhood professional develop-
ment systems, as provided by ORS 329.219.
(5) There is established in the State Treasury,  separate and distinct from the General Fund, the
Child Care Fund. The Child Care Fund shall consist  of moneys collected, received and administered
by the Office of Child Care and Department of Early  Learning and Care pursuant to ORS 329A.310,
329A.700 to 329A.712, 329A.750 and 329A.992 and such moneys as may be otherwise made  available
by law. Interest earned on the fund shall be credited to the fund. The moneys in the Child Care Fund
are appropriated continuously to the Department of Early Learning and Care and shall be used in
a manner consistent  with the grant of funds or for the administration of ORS 181A.200, 329A.030,
329A.250 to 329A.450 and 329A.700 to 329A.712.
SECTION 10.
 ORS 419B.035 is amended to read:
419B.035. (1) Notwithstanding the provisions of ORS 192.001  to 192.170, 192.210 to 192.478 and
192.610 to 192.810 relating to confidentiality and accessibility for public inspection of public records
and public documents, reports and records compiled under the provisions of  ORS 419B.010 to
419B.050 are confidential and may not be disclosed except as provided in this  section. The Depart-
ment of Human Services shall make the records available to:
(a) Any law enforcement agency or a child abuse registry in any other state for the  purpose of
subsequent investigation of child abuse;
(b) Any physician, physician assistant licensed under ORS 677.505 to 677.525 or nurse  practi-
tioner licensed under ORS 678.375 to 678.390,  at the request of the physician, physician assistant
or nurse practitioner, regarding any child brought to  the physician, physician assistant or nurse
practitioner or coming before the physician, physician assistant  or nurse practitioner for examina-
tion, care or treatment;
(c) Attorneys of record for the child or child’s parent or guardian in any juvenile court  pro-
ceeding;
(d) Citizen review boards established by the  Judicial Department for the purpose of periodically
reviewing the status  of children, youths and adjudicated youths under the jurisdiction of the juvenile
court under ORS 419B.100 and 419C.005. Citizen review boards may make such  records available to
participants in case reviews;
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 4
(e) A court appointed special advocate in  any juvenile court proceeding in which it is alleged
that a child has been subjected to child abuse or neglect;
[(f) The Office of Child Care for certifying, registering or otherwise regulating child care
facilities;]
(f) The Early Learning Division for the purpose of carrying  out the functions of the di-
vision, including the certification, registration  or regulation of child care facilities and child
care providers and the administration of enrollment in the Central Background Registry;
(g) The Office of Children’s Advocate;
(h) The Teacher Standards and Practices Commission for investigations  conducted under ORS
339.390 or 342.176 involving any child or any student;
(i) Any person, upon request to the Department of Human Services,  if the reports or records
requested regard an incident in which a child, as the result of abuse, died or suffered serious phys-
ical injury as defined in ORS 161.015. Reports or records  disclosed under this paragraph must be
disclosed in accordance with ORS 192.311 to 192.478;
[(j) The Office of Child Care for purposes of ORS 329A.030 (10)(g), (h) and (i); ]
(j) The Office of Child Care for purposes of applications described in  ORS 329A.030
(10)(c)(G), (H) and (I);
(k) With respect to a report of abuse occurring at  a school or in an educational setting that
involves a child with a disability, Disability Rights Oregon;
(L) The Department of Education for purposes of  investigations conducted under ORS 339.391;
and
(m) An education provider for the purpose of making determinations under ORS 339.388.
(2)(a) When disclosing reports and records pursuant to subsection (1)(i) of this section, the De-
partment of Human Services may exempt from disclosure the names, addresses and other identifying
information about other children, witnesses, victims or other persons  named in the report or record
if the department determines, in written findings,  that the safety or well-being of a person named in
the report or record may be jeopardized by disclosure of the names, addresses or  other identifying
information, and if that concern outweighs the public’s  interest in the disclosure of that information.
(b) If the Department of Human Services does not  have a report or record of abuse regarding
a child who, as the result of abuse, died or suffered serious physical injury as defined  in ORS
161.015, the department may disclose that information.
(3) The Department  of Human Services may make reports and records compiled under the pro-
visions of ORS 419B.010  to 419B.050 available to any person, administrative hearings officer, court,
agency, organization or other entity when the department determines that such disclosure is neces-
sary to administer its child welfare services and is in the best interests of the affected  child, or that
such disclosure is necessary to investigate, prevent or treat child abuse  and neglect, to protect
children from abuse and neglect or for  research when the Director of Human Services gives prior
written approval. The Department of Human Services shall adopt rules setting  forth the procedures
by which it will make the  disclosures authorized under this subsection or subsection (1) or (2) of this
section. The name, address and other identifying information  about the person who made the report
may not be disclosed pursuant to this subsection and subsection (1) of this section.
(4) A law enforcement agency may make reports and records compiled under the  provisions of
ORS 419B.010 to 419B.050 available to other law enforcement agencies, district attorneys, city  at-
torneys with criminal prosecutorial functions and the Attorney General when the law enforcement
agency determines that disclosure  is necessary for the investigation or enforcement of laws relating
to child abuse and neglect or necessary to determine a claim for crime  victim compensation under
ORS 147.005 to 147.367.
(5) A law enforcement agency, upon  completing an investigation and closing the file in a specific
case relating to child abuse or neglect, shall make reports and records  in the case available upon
request to any law enforcement agency or community corrections agency in this state, to  the De-
partment of Corrections, to the Oregon  Youth Authority or to the State Board of Parole and Post-
Prison Supervision for the purpose of managing and supervising offenders in custody  or on
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 5
probation, parole, post-prison supervision or other  form of conditional or supervised release. A law
enforcement agency may make reports and records compiled under the provisions  of ORS 419B.010
to 419B.050 available to  the Oregon Youth Authority, law enforcement, community corrections,
corrections or parole agencies in an open case when the law  enforcement agency determines that
the disclosure will not interfere with an ongoing investigation in the case.  The name, address and
other identifying information about the person who made the report may not be disclosed under  this
subsection or subsection (6)(b) of this section.
(6)(a) Any  record made available to a law enforcement agency or community corrections agency
in this state, to the Department of Corrections, the Oregon Youth  Authority or the State Board of
Parole and Post-Prison Supervision or to a physician,  physician assistant or nurse practitioner in
this state, as authorized by subsections (1) to (5) of this section, shall be kept confidential  by the
agency, department, board, physician, physician assistant or nurse practitioner. Any record or report
disclosed by the Department of Human Services to other persons or entities pursuant to subsections
(1) and (3) of this section shall be kept confidential.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection:
(A) A law enforcement agency, a community corrections agency, the Department of  Corrections,
the Oregon Youth Authority  and the State Board of Parole and Post-Prison Supervision may disclose
records made available to them under subsection  (5) of this section to each other, to law enforce-
ment, community corrections, corrections and parole agencies of other states and to authorized
treatment providers for the purpose of managing and supervising offenders in custody or on  pro-
bation, parole, post-prison supervision or other form of conditional or supervised release.
(B) The Department of Corrections and the Oregon  Youth Authority may disclose records made
available to them under subsection (5) of this section regarding a person in the  custody of the De-
partment of Corrections or the Oregon Youth Authority to  each other, to the court, to the district
attorney and to  the person’s attorney for the purpose of the person’s hearing under ORS 420A.200
to 420A.206.
(C) A person may disclose records made available to  the person under subsection (1)(i) of this
section if the records are disclosed for the purpose of advancing the public interest.
(7) Except as provided by ORS 339.389, an officer or employee  of the Department of Human
Services or of a law enforcement agency or any person or entity to  whom disclosure is made pur-
suant to  subsections (1) to (6) of this section may not release any information not authorized by
subsections (1) to (6) of this section.
(8) As used in this section, “law enforcement agency” has the meaning  given that term in ORS
181A.010.
(9) A person who violates subsection (6)(a) or (7) of this section commits a Class A violation.
CHILD CARE CENTRAL BACKGROUND REGISTRY
SECTION 11.
 ORS 307.480 is amended to read:
307.480. As used in ORS 307.480 to 307.510 unless the context requires otherwise:
(1) “Agricultural workforce housing” means housing:
(a) That is limited to  occupancy by agricultural workers, including agricultural workers who are
retired or disabled, and the immediate family members of the agricultural workers; and
(b) No dwelling unit of which is occupied  by a relative of the owner or operator of the agri-
cultural workforce housing, other than  a manufactured dwelling in a manufactured dwelling park
nonprofit cooperative as defined in ORS 62.803.
(2) “Eligible agricultural workforce housing” means agricultural workforce housing that:
(a) Is owned or operated by a nonprofit corporation as a nonprofit facility;
(b) Is not provided in connection with  the recruitment or employment of agricultural workers;
and
(c) Complies with all applicable local, state and federal building codes.
(3) “Eligible child care facility” means a child care facility that is:
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 6
(a) Certified under ORS [ 329A.030 and] 329A.250 to 329A.450;
(b) Owned or operated by a nonprofit corporation as a nonprofit facility; and
(c) Operated in conjunction or cooperation with an eligible farm labor camp.
(4) “Eligible farm labor camp” means a farm labor camp that:
(a) Is owned or operated by a nonprofit corporation as a nonprofit facility; and
(b) Complies with the safety and health standards for agricultural labor housing and related fa-
cilities adopted under the Oregon Safe Employment Act.
(5) “Farm labor camp” means any place, area or piece  of land where housing or sleeping places
are owned or maintained:
(a) By a person  engaged in the business of providing housing or sleeping places for employees
or prospective employees of another person  and the immediate families of the employees or pro-
spective employees if  the employees or prospective employees are or will be engaged in agricultural
work. Eligible farm labor camps may provide housing to workers not currently  engaged in agricul-
tural work  if agricultural work is not available and employees or prospective employees are re-
quired either to engage in agricultural work or to leave the  farm labor camp once agricultural work
becomes available in the area.
(b) In connection with any work or place where  agricultural work is being performed, whether
the housing or sleeping places are owned or maintained by the employer or by another person.
(6) “Owned or operated by a nonprofit corporation as a nonprofit facility”  includes, but is not
limited to:
(a) The possession or operation of agricultural workforce housing, child care facility or farm
labor camp property by  a nonprofit corporation pursuant to a written lease or lease-purchase
agreement if:
(A) The nonprofit corporation  is obligated under the terms of the lease or lease-purchase
agreement to pay the ad valorem taxes on the property used  in operating the agricultural workforce
housing, child care facility or farm labor camp; or
(B) The rent payable by the nonprofit corporation has  been established to reflect the savings
resulting from the exemption from taxation.
(b) The  possession or operation of the property by a partnership of which the nonprofit corpo-
ration is:
(A) A general partner or the general manager; and
(B) Responsible for the day-to-day operation of the property.
(7)(a) “Rental” means  the net amount of income from eligible agricultural workforce housing,
an eligible child  care facility or an eligible farm labor camp after deduction of costs paid or incurred
in the operation of the housing, facility or camp.
(b) Deductible costs under this subsection:
(A) Include, but are not  limited to, salaries or other compensation, insurance, utilities, garbage
disposal, supplies, repairs and maintenance, interest  and capital costs, whether capitalized and de-
preciated or amortized or deducted currently.
(B) Do not include in lieu taxes imposed under ORS 307.490.
SECTION 12.
 ORS 315.208 is amended to read:
315.208. (1) A credit against  the taxes otherwise due under ORS chapter 316 (or, if the taxpayer
is a corporation that is an employer,  under ORS chapter 317 or 318) is allowed to an employer,
based upon costs actually paid or incurred by the employer, to acquire, construct, reconstruct, ren-
ovate or otherwise improve real property so that the property  may be used primarily as a dependent
care facility.
(2) The credit allowed under this section shall be the least of:
(a) $2,500 multiplied by the number of full-time equivalent employees employed by the employer
(on the property or within such proximity to the property  that any dependents of the employees may
be cared for in the facility) on any date within the two years immediately preceding the end of  the
first tax year for which credit is first claimed;
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 7
(b) Fifty percent  of the cost of the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, renovation or other
improvement; or
(c) $100,000.
(3) To qualify for the credit allowed under subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The amounts paid or incurred by the employer for the acquisition, construction,  recon-
struction, renovation or other improvement to real property may be paid or incurred either:
(A) To another to be used to acquire,  construct, reconstruct, renovate or otherwise improve real
property to the end that it may be used  as a dependent care facility with which the employer con-
tracts to make dependent care assistance payments which payments  are wholly or partially entitled
to exclusion from income of the employee for federal tax  purposes under section 129 of the Internal
Revenue Code; or
(B) To acquire, construct, reconstruct, renovate or otherwise improve real property to the  end
that it may be operated by the employer, or a combination of employers, to provide dependent  care
assistance to the employees of the employer under a program or programs under which  the assist-
ance is, under section  129 of the Internal Revenue Code, wholly or partially excluded from the in-
come of the employee.
(b) The property must be in actual use as a dependent care facility on the  last day of the tax
year for which credit is claimed and  dependent care services assisted by the employer must take
place on the acquired, constructed, reconstructed, renovated or  improved property and must be en-
titled to an exclusion (whole or partial) from the income of  the employee for federal tax purposes
under section 129 of the Internal Revenue Code on the last  day of the tax year for which credit is
claimed.
(c) The person  or persons operating the dependent care facility on the property acquired, con-
structed, reconstructed, renovated or improved must hold  a certification (temporary or not) issued
under ORS [ 329A.030 and ] 329A.250 to 329A.450 by the Office of Child Care  to operate the facility
on the property  on the last day of the tax year of any tax year in which credit under this section
is claimed.
(d) The dependent care facility acquired, constructed, reconstructed, renovated or otherwise
improved must be located in Oregon. No credit shall be allowed under this  section if the dependent
care facility is not acquired, constructed, reconstructed, renovated  or improved to accommodate six
or more children.
(e) The employer must meet any other requirements or furnish any information, including in-
formation furnished by the employees or person operating the dependent care facility, to  the De-
partment of Revenue that the department requires under its rules to carry out the  purposes of this
section.
(f) The dependent care facility,  the costs of the acquisition, construction, reconstruction, reno-
vation or  improvement upon which the credit granted under this section is based, must be placed
in operation before January 1, 2002.
(4) The total amount of the  costs upon which the credit allowable under this section is based,
and the  total amount of the credit, shall be determined by the employer, subject to any rules adopted
by the department, during the tax year in which  the property acquired, constructed, reconstructed,
renovated or otherwise improved is first placed in operation as a  dependent care facility certified
by the Office of Child Care under ORS [ 329A.030 and] 329A.250 to 329A.450. One-tenth of the total
credit is allowable in  that tax year and one-tenth of the total credit is allowable in each succeeding
tax year, not to exceed nine tax years, thereafter. No credit shall be allowed under this  section for
any tax year at the end  of which the dependent care facility is not in actual operation under a
current certification (temporary or not) issued by the Office of Child  Care nor shall any credit be
allowed for any tax  year at the end of which the employer is not providing dependent care assist-
ance entitled to exclusion (whole or partial)  from employee income for federal tax purposes under
section 129 of the Internal Revenue Code for dependent care on the property. Any tax  credit al-
lowable under this  section in a tax year may be carried forward in the same manner and to the same
tax years as if it were a tax credit described in ORS 315.204.
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 8
(5) Nothing in this section shall  affect the computation of depreciation or basis of a dependent
care facility. If a deduction is allowed for purposes of ORS chapter 316, 317 or 318  for the amounts
paid or incurred upon which the credit under this section is based, the deduction  shall be reduced
by the dollar amount of the credit granted under this section.
(6) For purposes of the credit allowed under this section:
(a) The definitions and special rules contained in section 129(e) of the Internal Revenue Code
shall apply to the extent applicable.
(b) “Employer” means a resident, part-year resident or full-year nonresident employer  carrying
on a business, trade, occupation or profession in this state.
(7) The department  shall require that evidence that the person operating the dependent care
facility on the date that  the taxpayer’s tax year ends holds a current certification (temporary or
otherwise) to operate the facility accompany  the tax return on which any amount of tax credit
granted under this section  is claimed, or that such evidence be separately furnished. If the evidence
is not  so furnished, no credit shall be allowed for the tax year for which the evidence is not fur-
nished. The Office of Child Care shall cooperate by making such evidence, in an appropriate  form,
available to the person operating the facility, if the person is currently certified (temporary or  not)
so that, if necessary, it may be made available to the taxpayer.
SECTION 13.
 ORS 329A.270 is amended to read:
329A.270. (1) A certification or registration authorized by  ORS [ 329A.030 and ] 329A.250 to
329A.450 and issued to a child  care facility may be renewed upon submission of an application and
payment of the  required fee not later than 30 days prior to the expiration date of the current cer-
tification or registration if the Office of Child Care finds that the child care facility  that is seeking
renewal of the  certification or registration is in compliance with the requirements of ORS 181A.200,
329A.030 and 329A.250  to 329A.450 and the rules promulgated pursuant to ORS 181A.195, 181A.200,
181A.215, 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(2) Upon submission of  an application for renewal in proper time, manner and form, and payment
of the required fee, the current certification or registration, unless officially revoked, shall  remain
in force until the Office of Child Care has acted on the application for renewal  and has given notice
of the action taken.
SECTION 14.  ORS 329A.310 is amended to read:
329A.310. (1) Application for a certification or for the  annual renewal thereof shall be made to
the Office of Child Care on forms provided by the office  and accompanied by a nonrefundable fee.
The fee shall vary according to the type of facility and the number of children for  which the facility
is requesting to be certified, and shall  be determined and applied through rules adopted by the Early
Learning Council pursuant to ORS 329A.275.
(2) All fees received under subsection (1) of this  section shall be deposited in the Child Care
Fund established under  ORS 329A.010 and may be used for the administration of ORS 181A.200,
329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(3) Any certification issued pursuant to ORS [ 329A.030 and ] 329A.250 to 329A.450 authorizes
operation of the facility only on the  premises described in the certification and only by the person
named in the certification.
(4) Unless sooner revoked, a temporary  certification expires on the date specified therein. Un-
less sooner revoked  and except as provided in ORS 329A.270 (2), an annual certification expires one
year from the date of issuance.
SECTION 15.  ORS 329A.992, as amended by section 27 of this 2022 Act, is amended to read:
329A.992. (1) In addition to any other provision of law or rule adopted pursuant to ORS 329A.260
for enforcement of the provisions of ORS chapter 329A, the Office of Child Care may:
(a) Suspend or revoke a certification or registration issued under ORS  [ 329A.030 and ] 329A.250
to 329A.450, or impose a civil penalty in the manner provided in ORS 183.745, for violation of:
(A) Any of the provisions of ORS 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450;
(B) The terms and conditions of a certification  or registration issued under ORS [ 329A.030
and] 329A.250 to 329A.450; or
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 9
(C) Any rule of the Early Learning Council adopted under ORS 329A.030 and  329A.250 to
329A.450.
(b) Impose a civil penalty in the manner  provided in ORS 183.745 and file for injunctive relief
in a circuit court for the provision of child care, or for having a child in an individual’s care,  in
violation of ORS 329A.030 (2).
(c) Remove an individual described in  ORS 329A.030 (10)(d) from the Central Background Reg-
istry, or impose a civil penalty in the manner provided  in ORS 183.745, for the individual’s or the
subsidized care facility’s violation of:
(A) Any of the provisions of ORS 329A.030 or 329A.500; or
(B) Any rule of the Early Learning Council adopted under ORS 329A.030, 329A.500 or 329A.505
or of the Department of Human Services adopted under ORS 329A.500.
(2) The Early Learning Council may adopt by rule a schedule establishing  the civil penalties
that may be imposed under this section.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,  penalties imposed under this section may
not exceed:
(a) $750 per violation for a registered family child care home.
(b) $1,200 per violation for a certified family child care home.
(c) $2,500 per violation for a certified child care center that is not a family child care home.
(4) The office may impose a civil penalty of not more than $1,500 for a child care facility that
provides child care without a valid:
(a) Certification, in violation of ORS 329A.280; or
(b) Registration, in violation of ORS 329A.330.
(5) Each day that a child  care facility is operating in violation of any of the provisions described
in subsection (1) of this section is a separate violation.
(6) The office may revoke a child care facility’s certification or registration  or deny a child care
facility’s renewal application for a certification or registration if the facility fails to  pay a civil
penalty after the order imposing the penalty becomes final.
(7) A civil penalty imposed under this section may be remitted or reduced upon  such terms and
conditions as the office considers proper and consistent with the public health and safety.
(8) All moneys received under this section shall  be paid into the State Treasury and credited to
the General Fund.
SECTION 16.
 ORS 419B.005,  as amended by section 58, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
419B.005. As used in ORS 419B.005 to 419B.050, unless the context requires otherwise:
(1)(a) “Abuse” means:
(A) Any  assault, as defined in ORS chapter 163, of a child and any physical injury to a child
which has been  caused by other than accidental means, including any injury which appears to be
at variance with the explanation given of the injury.
(B) Any mental  injury to a child, which shall include only observable and substantial impairment
of the child’s mental  or psychological ability to function caused by cruelty to the child, with due
regard to the culture of the child.
(C) Rape of a child, which  includes but is not limited to rape, sodomy, unlawful sexual pene-
tration and incest, as those acts are described in ORS chapter 163.
(D) Sexual abuse, as described in ORS chapter 163.
(E) Sexual exploitation, including but not limited to:
(i) Contributing to the sexual delinquency of a  minor, as defined in ORS chapter 163, and any
other conduct which allows, employs, authorizes, permits, induces or encourages a child to  engage
in the performing for people to observe or the photographing, filming, tape  recording or other ex-
hibition which, in whole or in part, depicts sexual conduct or contact, as  defined in ORS 167.002 or
described in ORS 163.665 and 163.670, sexual abuse involving a child or rape of a  child, but not in-
cluding any conduct which is part of any  investigation conducted pursuant to ORS 419B.020 or
which is designed to serve educational or other legitimate purposes; and
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 10
(ii) Allowing, permitting, encouraging or hiring  a child to engage in prostitution as described in
ORS 167.007 or a commercial sex act  as defined in ORS 163.266, to purchase sex with a minor as
described in ORS 163.413 or to engage in commercial sexual solicitation  as described in ORS
167.008.
(F) Negligent treatment or maltreatment of a child, including but not limited  to the failure to
provide adequate food, clothing, shelter or medical care that  is likely to endanger the health or
welfare of the child.
(G) Threatened harm to a child, which means subjecting a child to a substantial  risk of harm
to the child’s health or welfare.
(H) Buying or selling a person under 18 years of age as described in ORS 163.537.
(I) Permitting  a person under 18 years of age to enter or remain in or upon premises where
methamphetamines are being manufactured.
(J) Unlawful exposure to a controlled substance, as defined in ORS 475.005, or to  the unlawful
manufacturing of a cannabinoid extract, as defined in ORS 475C.009, that subjects a child to  a sub-
stantial risk of harm to the child’s health or safety.
(b) “Abuse” does not  include reasonable discipline unless the discipline results in one of the
conditions described in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(2) “Child” means an unmarried person who:
(a) Is under 18 years of age; or
(b) Is under 21 years of age and residing in  or receiving care or services at a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205.
(3) “Higher education institution” means:
(a) A community college as defined in ORS 341.005;
(b) A public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(c) The Oregon Health and Science University; and
(d) A private institution of higher education located in Oregon.
(4)(a) “Investigation” means a detailed inquiry into or assessment  of the safety of a child alleged
to have experienced abuse.
(b) “Investigation” does not include screening activities conducted upon the  receipt of a report.
(5) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) A city or municipal police department.
(b) A county sheriff’s office.
(c) The Oregon State Police.
(d) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(e) A county juvenile department.
(6) “Public or private official” means:
(a) Physician or physician assistant licensed under  ORS chapter 677 or naturopathic physician,
including any intern or resident.
(b) Dentist.
(c) School employee, including an employee of a higher education institution.
(d) Licensed  practical nurse, registered nurse, nurse practitioner, nurse’s aide, home health aide
or employee of an in-home health service.
(e) Employee of the Department  of Human Services, Oregon Health Authority, Department of
Early Learning and Care, Department of Education, Youth Development Division, Office of  Child
Care, the Oregon Youth Authority, a local health department, a community mental health  program,
a community developmental disabilities program, a county juvenile department, a child-caring
agency as that term is defined in ORS 418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) Peace officer.
(g) Psychologist.
(h) Member of the clergy.
(i) Regulated social worker.
(j) Optometrist.
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 11
(k) Chiropractor.
(L) Certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) Attorney.
(n) Licensed professional counselor.
(o) Licensed marriage and family therapist.
(p) Firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(q) A court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(r) A child care provider registered or certified under ORS [ 329A.030 and] 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(s) An elected official of a branch of government  of this state or a state agency, board, com-
mission or department of a  branch of government of this state or of a city, county or other political
subdivision in this state.
(t) Physical, speech or occupational therapist.
(u) Audiologist.
(v) Speech-language pathologist.
(w) Employee of the Teacher Standards and  Practices Commission directly involved in investi-
gations or discipline by the commission.
(x) Pharmacist.
(y) An operator of a preschool recorded program under ORS 329A.255.
(z) An operator of a school-age recorded program under ORS 329A.257.
(aa) Employee of a private agency or  organization facilitating the provision of respite services,
as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents  pursuant to a properly executed power of attorney under ORS
109.056.
(bb) An employee of a public or private organization providing child-related services or  activ-
ities:
(A) Including but not limited to an employee of a:
(i) Youth group or center;
(ii) Scout group or camp;
(iii) Summer or day camp;
(iv) Survival camp; or
(v) Group, center or  camp that is operated under the guidance, supervision or auspices of a re-
ligious, public or private educational system or a community service organization; and
(B) Excluding an employee of a qualified victim services program as defined  in ORS 147.600 that
provides confidential, direct services to  victims of domestic violence, sexual assault, stalking or
human trafficking.
(cc) A coach, assistant coach or trainer of an amateur,  semiprofessional or professional athlete,
if compensated and if the athlete is a child.
(dd) Personal support worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ee) Home care worker, as defined in ORS 410.600.
(ff) Animal control officer, as defined in ORS 609.500.
(gg) Member of a school district board, an education service district board or  a public charter
school governing body.
(hh) An individual who is paid by  a public body, in accordance with ORS 430.215, to provide a
service identified in an individualized written  service plan of a child with a developmental disability.
(ii) Referral agent, as defined in ORS 418.351.
SECTION 17.
 ORS 433.235 is amended to read:
433.235. As used in ORS 433.235 to 433.284:
(1) “Administrator” means the principal or other person having  general control and supervision
of a school or children’s facility.
(2) “Children’s facility” or “facility” means:
(a) A certified child care facility as described in ORS [ 329A.030 and] 329A.250 to 329A.450, ex-
cept as exempted by rule of the Oregon Health Authority;
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 12
(b) A program operated by, or sharing the premises with, a certified child care  facility, school
or post-secondary institution where care is provided to children, six  weeks of age to kindergarten
entry, except as exempted by rule of the authority; or
(c) A program providing child care  or educational services to children, six weeks of age to
kindergarten  entry,  in a residential or nonresidential setting, except as exempted by rule of the
authority.
(3) “Local health department” has the meaning given that term in ORS 431.003.
(4) “Parent” means a parent or guardian of a child or any adult responsible for the child.
(5) “Physician” means a physician licensed by  the Oregon Medical Board or by the Oregon
Board of Naturopathic  Medicine or a physician similarly licensed by another state or country in
which the  physician practices or a commissioned medical officer of the Armed Forces or Public
Health Service of the United States.
(6) “School” means a public,  private, parochial, charter or alternative educational program of-
fering kindergarten  through grade 12 or any part thereof, except as exempted by rule of the au-
thority.
SECTION 18.
 ORS 609.652, as amended by section 60, chapter  631, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
609.652. As used in ORS 609.654:
(1)(a) “Aggravated animal abuse” means any animal abuse as described in ORS 167.322.
(b) “Aggravated animal abuse” does not include:
(A) Good animal husbandry, as defined in ORS 167.310; or
(B) Any exemption listed in ORS 167.335.
(2) “Law enforcement agency” means:
(a) Any city or municipal police department.
(b) A police department established by a university under ORS 352.121 or 353.125.
(c) Any county sheriff’s office.
(d) The Oregon State Police.
(e) A law  enforcement division of a county or municipal animal control agency that employs
sworn officers.
(f) A humane investigation agency as defined in ORS 181A.340 that employs humane  special
agents commissioned under ORS 181A.340.
(3) “Public or private official” means:
(a) A physician, including any intern or resident.
(b) A dentist.
(c) A school employee.
(d) A licensed practical nurse or registered nurse.
(e) An employee of the Department of Human Services, Oregon Health Authority,  Department
of Early Learning and Care, Youth Development Division, Office of Child Care,  the Oregon Youth
Authority,  a  local health department, a community mental health program, a community develop-
mental disabilities program, a county juvenile  department, a child-caring agency as defined in ORS
418.205 or an alcohol and drug treatment program.
(f) A peace officer.
(g) A psychologist.
(h) A member of the clergy.
(i) A regulated social worker.
(j) An optometrist.
(k) A chiropractor.
(L) A certified provider of foster care, or an employee thereof.
(m) An attorney.
(n) A naturopathic physician.
(o) A licensed professional counselor.
(p) A licensed marriage and family therapist.
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 13
(q) A firefighter or emergency medical services provider.
(r) A court appointed special advocate, as defined in ORS 419A.004.
(s) A child care provider registered or certified under ORS [ 329A.030 and] 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(t) A member of the Legislative Assembly.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 742.260 is amended to read:
742.260. (1) An insurer offering homeowner or renter liability or fire insurance  may not cancel
or refuse to issue or  renew a policy on a private home solely on the basis that the policyholder
operates a child care facility if the policyholder is registered or certified  pursuant to ORS [ 329A.030
and] 329A.250 to 329A.450.
(2) A  homeowner or renter liability or fire insurance policy may not provide coverage for losses
arising out of or in connection with child care provided  by a registered or certified child care fa-
cility. Coverage for losses arising out of or in connection  with child care by a registered or certified
child care facility may be provided only by a separate policy or  indorsement for which premiums
are assessed and paid.
(3) As used in this section, “child care facility” has the meaning given in ORS 329A.250.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 825.017 is amended to read:
825.017. Except as provided in this section and ORS 825.026 and 825.030, this  chapter does not
apply to the persons or vehicles described in this section. The exemption under this section  applies
to the following persons and vehicles:
(1) Vehicles being used by, or under contract with, any school board, district or person  respon-
sible for the administration of  elementary or secondary school activities, and engaged exclusively
in transporting students or combinations of students and other persons to or from school,  to or from
authorized school activities  or other activities sponsored by the governing board of a public uni-
versity listed in ORS 352.002, or for  purposes provided under ORS 332.427. This exemption shall not
be affected by the charging of a fee to cover the costs of the transportation.
(2) Vehicles being used in a taxicab operation if the vehicle:
(a) Is a passenger vehicle with a passenger seating capacity that does not exceed five;
(b) Carries passengers for hire where the destination  and route traveled may be controlled by
a passenger and the fare is calculated on the basis  of any combination of an initial fee, distance
traveled or waiting time; and
(c) Is transporting persons or property, or both, between points in Oregon.
(3) Vehicles being  used for the transportation of property by private carrier by means of a single
vehicle or combination of vehicles with a combined weight that does not exceed 8,000 pounds.
(4) Vehicles being used in operating implements of husbandry.
(5) Vehicles being used as a hearse or ambulance.
(6) Vehicles being used over any private road or thoroughfare.
(7) Vehicles being used on any road, thoroughfare or  property, other than a state highway,
county road or city street, for  the removal of forest products as defined in ORS 321.005, or the
product of forest products converted to a form other  than logs at or near the harvesting site, or
when used for the construction or maintenance of the road,  thoroughfare or property, pursuant to
a written agreement or permit authorizing the use, construction or maintenance of  the road,
thoroughfare or property, with:
(a) An agency of the United States;
(b) The State Board of Forestry;
(c) The State Forester; or
(d) A licensee of an agency named in this subsection.
(8) Vehicles being used on any county road for the removal of forest products as  defined in ORS
321.005, or the products of forest  products converted to a form other than logs at or near the har-
vesting site, if:
(a) The use is  pursuant to a written agreement entered into with the State Board of Forestry,
the State  Forester or an agency of the United States, authorizing the owner of the motor vehicle
to use the road and requiring the owner to pay for or to perform  the construction or maintenance
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 14
of the county road, including any operator of  a motor vehicle retained to transport logs, poles and
piling for the owners who are exempt under this section;
(b) The board, officer or agency that entered into the agreement or  granted the permit, by
contract with the county court or board of county commissioners,  has assumed the responsibility for
the construction or maintenance of the county road; and
(c) Copies of the agreements or  permits required by this subsection are filed with the Director
of Transportation.
(9) Vehicles being used in transporting persons with disabilities, with or  without their supervi-
sors or assistants, to or from rehabilitation facilities or child care  services if the motor vehicle is
a passenger motor vehicle  with a seating capacity of not more than 12 passengers. The exemption
provided by this subsection applies  only when the motor vehicle is operated by or under contract
with any person responsible for the administration of rehabilitation  facilities as defined in ORS
344.710 to 344.730 or child care services provided by a  facility licensed under ORS [ 329A.030 and ]
329A.250 to 329A.450.
(10) Vehicles  owned or operated by the United States or by any governmental jurisdiction within
the United States except as provided in ORS 825.022. This chapter does apply to vehicles when
owned or operated:
(a) As a carrier of property for hire;
(b) By a transportation district organized under ORS 267.510 to 267.650;
(c) By a county service district authorized to  provide public transportation under ORS 451.010;
or
(d) By an intergovernmental body formed by two or more public bodies, as defined in ORS
174.109, to provide public transportation.
(11) Vehicles  owned or operated by a mass transit district organized under ORS 267.010 to
267.394.
(12) Vehicles owned or operated by, or under contract with, a person responsible  for the con-
struction or reconstruction of a  highway under contract with the Department of Transportation or
with an agency of the United States  when operated within the immediate construction project as
described in the governmental agency contract during the construction period.
(13) Vehicles owned or operated by, or under contract with, a charitable organization when ex-
clusively engaged in performing transportation, either one way or round trip,  necessary to the op-
eration of the charitable  organization. As used in this subsection, “charitable organization” means
an organization that has no  capital stock and no provision for making dividends or profits, but de-
rives its funds principally  from public and private charity and holds them in trust for the promotion
of the welfare of others and  not for profit. Any organization claiming an exemption under this sub-
section shall file an affidavit with the department stating that it is organized and operated in ac-
cordance with the requirements of this subsection.
(14) Passenger vehicles with a passenger seating capacity that does not  exceed five when used
in the transportation of new telephone books.
(15) A vehicle that is used in  a limousine service operation in which the destination and route
traveled may be controlled by the passenger and  the fare is calculated on the basis of any combi-
nation of initial fee, distance traveled and waiting time if the vehicle:
(a) Is a passenger vehicle with a passenger seating capacity that does not exceed eight;
(b) Carries passengers for hire between points in Oregon; and
(c) Operates on an irregular route basis.
(16) Fire trucks and rescue vehicles that are designated as  emergency vehicles by the Depart-
ment of Transportation under ORS 801.260, while involved in emergency and related operations.
(17) A person who provides services related to the packing or  loading of household goods if the
person does not:
(a) Provide or operate a motor vehicle for the movement of the household goods; and
(b) Act as an agent for any person who does provide or operate a motor vehicle  for the move-
ment of the household goods.
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 15
SECTION 21. The amendments to ORS 307.480, 315.208, 329A.270, 329A.310, 329A.992,
419B.005, 433.235, 609.652, 742.260 and 825.017 by sections 11 to 20 of this  2022 Act become
operative on January 1, 2023.
SECTION 22.  ORS 329A.250 is amended to read:
329A.250. As used in ORS 329A.030 , [ and] 329A.250 to 329A.450  and 329A.500 , unless the con-
text requires otherwise:
(1) “Babysitter”  means a person who goes into the home of a child to give care during the
temporary absence of the parent or legal guardian or custodian.
(2) “Certification” means the  certification that is issued under ORS 329A.280 by the Office of
Child Care to a family child care home, child care center or other child care facility.
(3) “Child” means a child under 13 years of age  or a child under 18 years of age who has special
needs or disabilities and requires a level of care that is above normal for the child’s age.
(4)(a) “Child care” means the care, supervision and guidance on a regular basis of a child, un-
accompanied by a parent, guardian or custodian, provided to a child during a part of  the 24 hours
of the day, in a place other than the child’s home, with or without compensation.
(b) “Child care” does not include care provided:
(A) In the home of the child;
(B) By the child’s parent, guardian, or person acting in loco parentis;
(C) By a  person related to the child by blood or marriage within the fourth degree as determined
by civil law;
(D) On an occasional basis by a person not ordinarily engaged in providing child care;
(E) By providers of medical services;
(F) By a babysitter;
(G) By a person who cares for children from only one  family other than the person’s own family;
(H) By a person who  cares for no more than three children other than the person’s own chil-
dren; or
(I) By a person who is a member of the child’s  extended family, as determined by the office on
a case-by-case basis.
(5) “Child care facility” means any facility that provides child care to children,  including a day
nursery, nursery school, child care center, certified or registered family  child care home or similar
unit operating under any name, but not including any:
(a) Preschool recorded program.
(b) Facility providing care  for school-age children that is primarily a single enrichment activity,
for eight hours or less a week.
(c) Facility providing care that is primarily  group athletic or social activities sponsored by or
under the supervision of an organized club or hobby group.
(d) Facility operated by:
(A) A school district as defined in ORS 332.002;
(B) A political subdivision of this state; or
(C) A governmental agency.
(e) Residential facility licensed under ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
(f) Babysitters.
(g) Facility operated as a parent cooperative for no more than four hours a day.
(h) Facility providing care while the child’s parent remains on the  premises and is engaged in
an activity offered by the facility or in other nonwork activity.
(i) Facility operated as a school-age recorded program.
(6) “Family” has the meaning given that term in ORS 329.145.
(7) “Occasional” means that care is provided for no more than 70 days in any calendar year.
(8) “Parent cooperative” means a child care program in which:
(a) Care is provided by parents on a rotating basis;
(b) Membership in the cooperative includes parents;
(c) There are written policies and procedures; and
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 16
(d) A board of directors  that includes parents of the children cared for by the cooperative con-
trols the policies and procedures of the program.
(9) “Preschool  recorded program” means a facility providing care for preschool children that is
primarily educational for  four hours or less per day and where no child is present at the facility for
more than four hours per day.
(10) “Record” means the record that is issued under  ORS 329A.255 to a preschool recorded
program or under ORS 329A.257 to a school-age recorded program.
(11) “Registration” means the registration that is issued under ORS 329A.330 by the Office  of
Child Care to a family  child care home where care is provided in the family living quarters of the
provider’s  home.
(12) “School age” means of an age eligible to be enrolled in  kindergarten or above on or before
the first day of the current school year.
(13) “School-age recorded program” means a program for school-age children:
(a) That is not operated by a school district as defined in ORS 332.002;
(b) That is not required to be certified under  ORS 329A.280 or registered under ORS 329A.330;
and
(c) In which youth development activities are provided to children during  hours that school is
not in session and does not take the place of a parent’s care.
(14)(a) “Subsidized care” means the care,  supervision and guidance on a regular basis of
a child, unaccompanied by a parent, guardian or custodian, provided to a  child during a part
of the 24 hours of a day, paid for in whole or in part by public funds.
(b) “Subsidized care” does not include care provided:
(A) By the child’s parent, guardian or person acting in loco parentis;
(B) By a sibling living in the same home as the child;
(C) By a person on the same subsidized care case of a child in care; or
(D) By a provider  of medical services, as determined by the office on a case-by-case basis.
(15) “Subsidized care facility” means any facility  that provides subsidized care to chil-
dren, including a day nursery, nursery school, child care center, certified or registered
family child  care home or similar unit operating under any name, but not including any
program or facility identified by the Early Learning Council by rule.
[(14)] (16) “Youth development activities” means care,  supervision or guidance that is intended
for enrichment, including but  not limited to teaching skills or proficiency in physical, social or ed-
ucational activities such  as tutoring, music lessons, social activities, sports and recreational activ-
ities.
SECTION 23.
 ORS 329A.250, as amended  by section 40, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
329A.250. As used in ORS 329A.030 , [ and] 329A.250 to 329A.450  and 329A.500 , unless the con-
text requires otherwise:
(1) “Babysitter”  means a person who goes into the home of a child to give care during the
temporary absence of the parent or legal guardian or custodian.
(2) “Certification” means the  certification that is issued under ORS 329A.280 by the Office of
Child Care to a family child care home, child care center or other child care facility.
(3) “Child” means a child under 13 years of age  or a child under 18 years of age who has special
needs or disabilities and requires a level of care that is above normal for the child’s age.
(4)(a) “Child care” means the care, supervision and guidance on a regular basis of a child, un-
accompanied by a parent, guardian or custodian, provided to a child during a part of  the 24 hours
of the day, in a place other than the child’s home, with or without compensation.
(b) “Child care” does not include care provided:
(A) In the home of the child;
(B) By the child’s parent, guardian, or person acting in loco parentis;
(C) By a  person related to the child by blood or marriage within the fourth degree as determined
by civil law;
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 17
(D) On an occasional basis by a person not ordinarily engaged in providing child care;
(E) By providers of medical services;
(F) By a babysitter;
(G) By a person who cares for children from only one  family other than the person’s own family;
(H) By a person who cares for no more than three children other than  the person’s own chil-
dren; or
(I) By a person who is a member of  the child’s extended family, as determined by the office on
a case-by-case basis.
(5) “Child care facility” means any facility that provides child care to children,  including a day
nursery, nursery school, child care center,  certified or registered family child care home or similar
unit operating under any name, but not including any:
(a) Preschool recorded program.
(b) Facility providing care  for school-age children that is primarily a single enrichment activity,
for eight hours or less a week.
(c) Facility providing care that is primarily group athletic  or social activities sponsored by or
under the supervision of an organized club or hobby group.
(d) Facility operated by:
(A) A school district as defined in ORS 332.002;
(B) A political subdivision of this state; or
(C) A governmental agency.
(e) Residential facility licensed under ORS 443.400 to 443.455.
(f) Babysitters.
(g) Facility operated as a parent cooperative for no more than four hours a day.
(h) Facility providing care while the  child’s parent remains on the premises and is engaged in
an activity offered by the facility or in other nonwork activity.
(i) Facility operated as a school-age recorded program.
(6) “Family” has the meaning given that term in ORS 329.155.
(7) “Occasional” means that care is provided for no more than 70 days in any calendar year.
(8) “Parent cooperative” means a child care program in which:
(a) Care is provided by parents on a rotating basis;
(b) Membership in the cooperative includes parents;
(c) There are written policies and procedures; and
(d) A board of directors that includes parents of the children cared for  by the cooperative con-
trols the policies and procedures of the program.
(9) “Preschool  recorded program” means a facility providing care for preschool children that is
primarily educational for  four hours or less per day and where no child is present at the facility for
more than four hours per day.
(10) “Record” means the record that is issued under  ORS 329A.255 to a preschool recorded
program or under ORS 329A.257 to a school-age recorded program.
(11) “Registration” means the registration that is issued under ORS 329A.330 by the Office  of
Child Care to a family  child care home where care is provided in the family living quarters of the
provider’s  home.
(12) “School age” means of an age eligible to be enrolled in  kindergarten or above on or before
the first day of the current school year.
(13) “School-age recorded program” means a program for school-age children:
(a) That is not operated by a school district as defined in ORS 332.002;
(b) That is not required to be certified under  ORS 329A.280 or registered under ORS 329A.330;
and
(c) In which youth development activities are provided to children during  hours that school is
not in session and does not take the place of a parent’s care.
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 18
(14)(a) “Subsidized care” means the care,  supervision and guidance on a regular basis of
a child, unaccompanied by a parent, guardian or custodian, provided to a  child during a part
of the 24 hours of a day, paid for in whole or in part by public funds.
(b) “Subsidized care” does not include care provided:
(A) By the child’s parent, guardian or person acting in loco parentis;
(B) By a sibling living in the same home as the child;
(C) By a person on the same subsidized care case of a child in care; or
(D) By a provider  of medical services, as determined by the office on a case-by-case basis.
(15) “Subsidized care facility” means any facility  that provides subsidized care to chil-
dren, including a day nursery, nursery school, child care center, certified or registered
family child care home or similar unit operating under any name, but not including  any
program or facility identified by the Early Learning Council by rule.
[(14)] (16) “Youth development activities” means care,  supervision or guidance that is intended
for enrichment, including but not limited to teaching skills or proficiency in physical,  social or ed-
ucational activities such as tutoring, music lessons, social activities, sports and  recreational activ-
ities.
SECTION 24.
 ORS 329A.500 is amended to read:
329A.500. (1)  As used in this section, “family” means any individual who is responsible for the
care, control and supervision of a child.
(2) The Department of Human Services and the Early Learning Council shall adopt rules  for the
operation of the Employment Related Day Care subsidy program and for other  subsidy programs
administered by the department.
(3) The rules adopted under  this section must support equitable access to a supply of diverse
[child care providers ] subsidized care facilities  that meet the needs of families, as  those needs are
defined by the department by rule, including:
(a) Cultural diversity;
(b) Linguistic diversity;
(c) Racial and ethnic diversity; and
(d) Diversity of [ provider] subsidized care facility types.
(4) The rules adopted under this section must provide that:
(a) A child’s eligibility to participate in the Employment Related Day Care subsidy program
must be based on:
(A) The household income of a child’s family; and
(B) Any other criteria established by the department.
(b) A child must be able to receive care that:
(A) Meets the child’s developmental, disability and neurodiversity needs; and
(B) Enables the child’s family to complete activities that relate to family well-being, which may
include the family’s work hours, education hours, commute time,  study time and other activities that
support family well-being.
(c) Payment to [ child care providers ] subsidized care facilities  must  be based on enrollment
instead of attendance.
(d) A child’s  family may qualify for an incentive if the family voluntarily chooses a [ child care
provider] subsidized care facility  that participates  in the quality recognition and improvement
system established under ORS 329A.261.  A fair representation of the recipients who qualify for in-
centives must be families with children who are from underserved  racial, ethnic or minority popu-
lations. In addition, [ child care providers ] subsidized care facilities  that participate in the quality
recognition and improvement system may receive financial incentives  under the subsidy programs
in accordance with criteria established by rule.
(e) A child  care facility is not eligible to be a subsidized care facility and to receive a
reimbursement under the subsidy program unless each subject individual described in ORS
329A.030 (10)(d) who operates, resides in or may have  unsupervised contact with children at
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 19
the subsidized care facility that provides or will  provide subsidized care to the person’s child
is enrolled in the Central Background Registry under ORS 329A.030.
(5) Taking  into account the availability of funds, the rules adopted under this section must es-
tablish a sliding scale for copayment, with the requirement that  a copayment may not exceed seven
percent of the household income of the child’s family.
(6) In developing rules under this section,  the department shall consider policies for increasing
the stability and continuity of a child’s access to a family’s preferred child care [ provider] facility.
(7) Rules adopted by the department under this section establish minimum  requirements per-
taining to the Employment Related Day Care  subsidy program and may not be construed to preempt,
limit or otherwise diminish the  applicability of any policy, standard or collective bargaining agree-
ment that provides for an increased subsidy  or a [ child care provider ] subsidized care facility re-
imbursement amount under state or federal law.
(8)(a) The department shall  work to meet federal recommendations for income eligibility and
market access in regard to the Employment Related Day  Care subsidy program administered by the
department.
(b) Notwithstanding any  provision of this section or any rule adopted by the department pursu-
ant to this section, the laws and regulations applicable to any federal funds shall  govern when any
aspect of child care is funded by federal funds.
SECTION 25.  ORS 329A.500, as amended by section 73, chapter  631, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
329A.500. (1) As used in this section, “family” means any individual who is responsible for  the
care, control and supervision of a child.
(2) The Early  Learning Council shall adopt rules for the operation of the Employment Related
Day Care  subsidy program and for other subsidy programs  administered by the Department of
Early Learning and Care.
(3) The rules adopted under  this section must support equitable access to a supply of diverse
[child care providers ] subsidized care facilities  that meet the needs of families, as  those needs are
defined by the council by rule, including:
(a) Cultural diversity;
(b) Linguistic diversity;
(c) Racial and ethnic diversity; and
(d) Diversity of [ provider] subsidized care facility types.
(4) The rules adopted under this section must provide that:
(a) A child’s eligibility to participate in the Employment Related Day Care subsidy program
must be based on:
(A) The household income of a child’s family; and
(B) Any other criteria established by the council.
(b) A child must be able to receive care that:
(A) Meets the child’s developmental, disability and neurodiversity needs; and
(B) Enables the child’s family to complete activities that relate to family well-being, which may
include the family’s work hours, education hours, commute time,  study time and other activities that
support family well-being.
(c) Payment to [ child care providers ] subsidized care facilities  must  be based on enrollment
instead of attendance.
(d) A child’s  family may qualify for an incentive if the family voluntarily chooses a [ child care
provider] subsidized care facility  that participates  in the quality recognition and improvement
system established under ORS 329A.261.  A fair representation of the recipients who qualify for in-
centives must be families with children who are from underserved  racial, ethnic or minority popu-
lations. In addition, [ child care providers ] subsidized care facilities  that participate in the quality
recognition and improvement system may receive financial incentives  under the subsidy programs
in accordance with criteria established by rule.
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 20
(e) A child  care facility is not eligible to be a subsidized care facility and to receive a
reimbursement under the subsidy program unless each subject individual described in ORS
329A.030 (10)(d) who operates, resides in or may have  unsupervised contact with children at
the subsidized care facility that provides or will  provide subsidized care to the person’s child
is enrolled in the Central Background Registry under ORS 329A.030.
[(e)] (f) A [ child care provider ] subsidized care facility may be eligible to receive a higher rate
of reimbursement or other financial incentives for:
(A) Participating in quality improvement measures;
(B) Providing culturally or linguistically specific or appropriate care;
(C) Providing evening, overnight or weekend care;
(D) Providing care to children with a diagnosed disability;
(E) Providing infant or toddler care;
(F) Providing care to a population that has been identified as historically having  an inadequate
child care [ provider] facility supply; or
(G) Providing any other specialized care that justifies a higher rate of reimbursement.
(5) Taking into account the availability of funds, the rules adopted under this section:
(a) Must establish a sliding  scale for copayment, with the requirement that a copayment may
not exceed seven percent of the household income of the child’s family.
(b) Must provide that  eligibility to participate in the Employment Related Day Care subsidy
program:
(A) May not be based on the citizenship or legal status of a child or a child’s family; and
(B) Shall, for a  child who met the initial eligibility requirements prescribed under subsection (4)
of this section, continue for a minimum of 12 months  from the date of initial eligibility unless the
child’s family leaves this state or requests a termination  of benefits or for any other reason identi-
fied by the council. Rules adopted under this subparagraph shall  give priority to families receiving
temporary assistance under the temporary assistance for needy families program described in  ORS
412.006.
(c) May provide that a determination  of eligibility to participate in the Employment Related Day
Care subsidy program consider the availability of family to attend to the child,  regardless of the
family’s physical presence.
(6) In developing rules under this section, the  council shall consider policies for increasing the
stability and continuity of a child’s access to a family’s preferred child care [ provider] facility.
(7) Rules adopted by the council under this section establish minimum requirements  pertaining
to the Employment Related Day  Care subsidy program and may not be construed to preempt, limit
or otherwise diminish  the applicability of any policy, standard or collective bargaining agreement
that provides for an increased subsidy or a  [ child care provider ] subsidized care facility  re-
imbursement amount under state or federal law.
(8)(a) The council  shall work to meet federal recommendations for income eligibility and market
access in regard to the Employment Related Day Care subsidy program administered  by the council.
(b) Notwithstanding any provision of this section or any  rule adopted by the council pursuant
to this section, the laws and  regulations applicable to any federal funds shall govern when any as-
pect of child care is funded by federal funds.
SECTION 26.
 ORS 329A.030 is amended to read:
329A.030. (1) The Office of Child Care shall  establish a Central Background Registry and may
maintain information in the registry through electronic records systems.
[(2)(a) A subject individual shall apply to and must be enrolled in the Central Background Registry
as part of the individual’s application to operate a program or serve in a position described  in sub-
section (10) of this section. ]
(2)(a) A subject individual described in subsection (10)(a), (c)  or (d) of this section shall
apply to and must be enrolled in the Central Background Registry prior to  the provision of
care.
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 21
(b) An individual who has been the subject of a founded or substantiated  report of child abuse
shall apply to and must be enrolled in the Central Background Registry prior to providing any of
the types of care identified in ORS 329A.250 (4)(b)(A), (G) or (H) if:
(A) The child abuse occurred on or  after January 1, 2017, and involved a child who died or
suffered serious physical injury, as defined in ORS 161.015; or
(B) The child abuse  occurred on or after September 1, 2019, and involved any child for whom
the individual was providing child care, as defined in ORS 329A.250  (4), or care identified in ORS
329A.250 (4)(b)(A), (C), (F), (G), (H) or (I).
(c) Notwithstanding  paragraph (a) of this subsection, an individual described in paragraph (b)(B)
of this subsection  is not required to enroll in the Central Background Registry if more than seven
years has elapsed since the date of the child abuse determination.
(3)(a) Upon receiving an application for  enrollment in the Central Background Registry, the of-
fice shall complete:
(A) A criminal records check under ORS 181A.195;
(B) A criminal records check of other registries or databases  in accordance with rules adopted
by the Early Learning Council;
(C) A child abuse and neglect records check  in accordance with rules adopted by the council;
and
(D) A foster care certification check and an adult protective services  check in accordance with
rules adopted by the council.
(b) In addition to the information that the office is required to check  under paragraph (a) of this
subsection, the office may  consider any other information obtained by the office that the office, by
rule, determines is relevant to enrollment in the Central Background Registry.
(4)[(a)] The office shall enroll the individual in the Central Background Registry if the individ-
ual:
[(A)] (a) Is determined to have no criminal,  child abuse and neglect, negative adult protective
services or negative foster home certification history, or to  have dealt with the issues and provided
adequate evidence of suitability for the registry;
[(B)] (b) Has paid the applicable fee established pursuant to ORS 329A.275; and
[(C)] (c) Has complied with the rules  of the Early Learning Council adopted pursuant to this
section.
[(b) Notwithstanding subsection (3) of this section and paragraph (a) of this subsection, the  office
may enroll an individual in the registry if the  Department of Human Services has completed a back-
ground check on the  individual and the individual has received approval from the department for
purposes of providing child care. ]
(5)(a) Notwithstanding subsections (3) and (4) of this section, the office may not enroll an  indi-
vidual in the Central Background Registry if:
(A) The individual has a disqualifying condition as defined in rules adopted by the council; or
(B) The individual is an exempt prohibited individual, as provided by ORS 329A.252.
(b) If an individual prohibited from enrolling in the registry as provided  by this subsection is
enrolled in the registry, the office shall remove the individual from the registry.
(6)(a) The office may conditionally enroll  an individual in the Central Background Registry
pending the results of a nationwide criminal records check through the Federal Bureau  of Investi-
gation if the individual has successfully  completed the criminal records check and the child abuse
and neglect records check in  this state and in the state of the individual’s residence, if other than
Oregon.
(b) The office may enroll  an individual in the registry subject to limitations identified in rules
adopted by the council.
(7) An enrollment in the Central Background Registry may be  renewed upon application to the
office, payment of the fee established pursuant to ORS 329A.275 and compliance with rules adopted
by the Early Learning Council pursuant to this section. However, an individual who is determined
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 22
to be ineligible for  enrollment in the registry after the date of initial enrollment shall be removed
or suspended from the registry by the office.
(8)(a) A child care facility shall not hire or employ an individual if the individual  is not enrolled
in the Central Background Registry.
(b) Notwithstanding paragraph (a) of this subsection, a child care facility may  employ on a
probationary basis an individual who is conditionally enrolled in the Central Background Registry.
(9) The  Early Learning Council may adopt any rules necessary to carry out the purposes of this
section, including but not limited to rules regarding expiration and renewal  periods and limitations
related to the subject individual’s enrollment in the Central Background Registry.
(10) [For purposes of ] As used in  this section, “subject individual” means :
(a) A subject individual as defined by the Early Learning Council by rule[ ,];
(b) An individual subject to subsection (2)(b) of this section [ or];
(c) A person who applies to be:
[(a)] (A) The operator or an employee of a child care or treatment program;
[(b)] (B) The operator or an employee of  an Oregon prekindergarten program under ORS 329.170
to 329.200;
[(c)] (C) The operator or  an employee of a federal Head Start program regulated by the United
States Department of Health and Human Services;
[(d)] (D) An individual in a child care facility who may have unsupervised contact with  children
[as identified by the office ], as determined by the council by rule ;
[(e)] (E) A contractor or an  employee of the contractor who provides early childhood special
education or early intervention services pursuant to ORS 343.455 to 343.534;
[(f)] (F) A child  care provider who is required to be enrolled in the Central Background Registry
by any state agency;
[(g)] (G) A contractor, employee or volunteer of a metropolitan  service district organized under
ORS chapter 268 who may have unsupervised  contact with children and who is required to be en-
rolled in the Central Background Registry by the metropolitan service district;
[(h)] (H) A provider  of respite services, as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents pursuant to a
properly executed power of attorney under ORS 109.056 who is  providing respite services as a vol-
unteer with a private agency or organization that facilitates  the provision of such respite services;
or
[(i)] (I) The operator  or an employee of an early learning program as defined in rules adopted
by the council[ .]; or
(d)(A) An individual who operates a subsidized care facility;
(B) An individual who has attained 18 years of age and resides in a subsidized care facil-
ity; or
(C) An individual in a subsidized care facility who has attained 18 years of  age and who
may have unsupervised contact with children, as determined by the council by rule.
(11)(a) Information provided to a metropolitan service district  organized under ORS chapter 268
about the enrollment  status of the persons described in subsection [ (10)(g)] (10)(c)(G) of this section
shall be subject to a reciprocal  agreement with the metropolitan service district. The agreement
must provide for the recovery of administrative, including direct  and indirect, costs incurred by the
office from participation in the agreement. Any moneys  collected under this paragraph shall be
deposited in the Child Care Fund established under ORS 329A.010.
(b) Information provided to a  private agency or organization facilitating the provision of respite
services, as defined in ORS 418.205, for parents pursuant to  a properly executed power of attorney
under ORS 109.056 about the enrollment status of the persons described in subsection  [ (10)(h)]
(10)(c)(H) of this section shall be subject to an agreement with the private agency or organization.
The agreement must provide for  the recovery of administrative, including direct and indirect, costs
incurred by the office from participation  in the agreement. Any moneys collected under this para-
graph shall be deposited in the Child Care Fund established under ORS 329A.010.
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 23
(c) Information  provided to a private agency or organization about the enrollment status of the
persons described in subsection [ (10)(i)] (10)(c)(I) of this section shall be subject to an  agreement
with the private agency or organization. The  agreement must provide for the recovery of adminis-
trative, including direct and indirect, costs incurred by the office from participation in the  agree-
ment. Any moneys collected under this paragraph shall be  deposited in the Child Care Fund
established under ORS 329A.010.
SECTION 27.  ORS 329A.992 is amended to read:
329A.992. (1) In addition to any other provision of law or rule adopted pursuant to ORS 329A.260
for enforcement of the provisions of ORS chapter 329A, the Office of Child Care may:
(a) Suspend  or revoke a certification or registration issued under ORS 329A.030 and 329A.250
to 329A.450, or impose a civil penalty in the manner provided in ORS 183.745, for violation of:
(A) Any of the provisions of ORS 329A.030 and 329A.250 to 329A.450;
(B) The terms and conditions  of a certification or registration issued under ORS 329A.030 and
329A.250 to 329A.450; or
(C) Any rule of the Early Learning Council adopted under ORS 329A.030 and  329A.250 to
329A.450.
(b) Impose a civil penalty in the manner  provided in ORS 183.745 and file for injunctive relief
in a circuit court for the provision of child care, or for having a child in an individual’s care,  in
violation of ORS 329A.030 (2).
(c) Remove an individual described in ORS 329A.030 (10)(d) from the Central Background
Registry, or impose a civil penalty  in the manner provided in ORS 183.745, for the individual’s
or the subsidized care facility’s violation of:
(A) Any of the provisions of ORS 329A.030 or 329A.500; or
(B) Any rule of the Early Learning Council adopted under ORS 329A.030, 329A.500  or
329A.505 or of the Department of Human Services adopted under ORS 329A.500.
(2) The Early Learning  Council may adopt by rule a schedule establishing the civil penalties
that may be imposed under this section.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section,  penalties imposed under this section may
not exceed:
(a) $750 per violation for a registered family child care home.
(b) $1,200 per violation for a certified family child care home.
(c) $2,500 per violation for a certified child care center that is not a family child care home.
(4) The office may impose a civil penalty of not more than $1,500 for a child care facility that
provides child care without a valid:
(a) Certification, in violation of ORS 329A.280; or
(b) Registration, in violation of ORS 329A.330.
(5) Each day that a child  care facility is operating in violation of any of the provisions described
in subsection (1) of this section is a separate violation.
(6) The office may revoke a child care facility’s certification or registration  or deny a child care
facility’s renewal application for  a certification or registration if the facility fails to pay a civil
penalty after the order imposing the penalty becomes final.
(7) A civil penalty imposed under this section may be remitted or reduced upon  such terms and
conditions as the office considers proper and consistent with the public health and safety.
(8) All moneys received under this section shall  be paid into the State Treasury and credited to
the General Fund.
SECTION 28.
(1)(a) The amendments to ORS 329A.030,  329A.250, 329A.500 and 329A.992
by sections 22 to 27 of this 2022 Act apply to subsidized  care facilities providing subsidized
care under ORS 329A.500 on or after July 1, 2023.
(b) On or after July 1, 2023, a subject  individual described in ORS 329A.030 (10)(d) must
enroll in the Central Background Registry under ORS 329A.030 for the purpose of the Em-
ployment Related Day Care subsidy program.
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 24
(2) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section and ORS 329A.030 (2)(a), as  amended
by section 26 of this 2022 Act:
(a) A subject individual described  in ORS 329A.030 (10)(d) who was approved before July
1, 2023, as a provider of care by  the Department of Human Services for the purposes of the
Employment Related Day Care subsidy program is not required to enroll in the Central
Background Registry until the earlier of the expiration  of a child care background check or
June 30, 2025.
(b) Until July 1,  2023, a subject individual described in ORS 329A.030 (10)(d) who is seeking
initial approval or renewed approval as a provider of care for purposes of the  Employment
Related Day Care subsidy program may choose  to enroll in the Central Background Registry
under ORS 329A.030 or may seek a child background check through the Department  of Hu-
man Services.
(3) For the purpose of transferring the  Employment Related Day Care subsidy program
from the Department of Human Services to the Department of  Early Learning and Care, as
provided by section 79, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, the Department of Human Services
and the Early Learning Council shall adopt rules that provide:
(a) Until July 1, 2023, the Department of  Human Services shall accept an individual’s
enrollment in the Central Background Registry as satisfying any requirement for background
checks for the Employment Related Day Care subsidy program.
(b) Until July 1, 2025, the Office of  Child Care shall accept the Department of Human
Service’s background check of an individual for  the purposes of the Employment Related Day
Care subsidy program as satisfying the requirements of the Central Background Registry.
(4) No later than July 1, 2023, the Department of Human Services shall transfer copies
of all files  necessary for the Office of Child Care to provide background checks for individuals
described in ORS 329A.030 (10)(d).
SECTION 28a.
Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the Department of Education by section 1 (1), chapter 603, Oregon Laws  2021,
for the biennium ending June 30, 2023, for operations, is increased by $1,170,074, for purposes
of section 28 of this 2022 Act and ORS  329A.030, 329A.250, 329A.500 and 329A.992, as amended
by sections 22 to 27 of this 2022 Act.
USE OF EARLY LEARNING ACCOUNT MONEYS
SECTION 29.
 ORS 327.274 is amended to read:
327.274. (1) The Department of Education and  the Early Learning Division shall use moneys in
the Early Learning Account to  provide funding for early learning programs in a manner consistent
with a statewide early learning system plan overseen by the Early Learning Council. Early learning
programs that may receive moneys from the Early Learning Account include:
(a) Early childhood special education  or early intervention services, as provided by ORS 343.475;
(b) Relief nurseries;
(c) Programs funded by the Early Childhood Equity Fund;
(d) The Oregon prekindergarten program and other public preschool programs established  under
ORS 329.170 to 329.200, by increasing:
(A) The total number of spaces for children served by the programs; or
(B) Existing spaces for full-day programs from half-day programs;
(e) Professional development for early childhood educators; and
(f) Early Head Start programs.
(2) In addition to the uses identified in subsection (1) of this  section, moneys in the Early
Learning Account may be used for :
(a) Staffing needs of the Early Learning Division for the purpose of implementing this section.
(b) Costs incurred by the division in conducting the biennial  evaluation of programs that
receive grants under ORS 417.782.
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 25
(3) The State Board of Education and the Early Learning Council shall adopt rules  necessary
for the distribution of moneys under this section.
SECTION 30.  ORS 327.274, as amended  by section 21, chapter 631, Oregon Laws 2021, is
amended to read:
327.274. (1) The Department of Early Learning and Care shall use moneys in  the Early Learning
Account to provide funding for early learning programs in a manner consistent with a statewide
early learning system plan overseen by the Early Learning Council. Early learning programs that
may receive moneys from the Early Learning Account include:
(a) Early childhood special education  or early intervention services, as provided by ORS 343.475;
(b) Relief nurseries;
(c) Programs funded by the Early Childhood Equity Fund;
(d) The Oregon prekindergarten program and other public preschool programs established  under
ORS 329.170 to 329.200, by increasing:
(A) The total number of spaces for children served by the programs; or
(B) Existing spaces for full-day programs from half-day programs;
(e) Professional development for early childhood educators; and
(f) Early Head Start programs.
(2) In addition to the uses identified in subsection (1) of this  section, moneys in the Early
Learning Account may be used for :
(a) Staffing needs  of the Department of Early Learning and Care for the purpose of implement-
ing this section.
(b) Costs incurred by the department in conducting the biennial evaluation of  programs
that receive grants under ORS 417.782.
(3) The Early  Learning Council shall adopt rules necessary for the distribution of moneys under
this section.
REIMBURSEMENT RATE FOR EMPLOYMENT RELATED DAY CARE
SECTION 31.
(1) No later than June 1, 2022,  the Department of Human Services shall
adopt rules to provide reimbursement  rates under the Employment Related Day Care subsidy
program, operated as provided by ORS 329A.500, that are at least:
(a) For child care provided in a certified  or registered family child care home or in a
certified child care  center, the 90th percentile of the 2020 Oregon Child Care Market Price
Study rate.
(b) For child care provided by an exempt child care center that is  enhanced, 85 percent
of the rate that applies to child care provided in a certified child care center.
(c) For child care provided by an exempt child care center  that is not enhanced, 75 per-
cent of the rate that applies to child care provided in a certified child care center.
(d) For an exempt family child care home, regardless of enhanced or  not enhanced, an
18 percent increase to the rates  for those providers, as calculated based on the Department
of Human Services maximum rates in effect on January 1, 2022.
(2) As used in this section:
(a) “Enhanced” means a child  care provider that meets training requirements prescribed
by the Department of Human Services by rule.
(b) “Exempt” means a child care provider or center that is exempt from certification  by
the Office of Child Care under rules adopted by the Early Learning Council.
SECTION 32.
Section 31 of this 2022 Act is repealed on June 30, 2023.
SECTION 32a. Notwithstanding any other provision of  law, the General Fund appropri-
ation made to the  Department of Human Services by section 1 (3), chapter 606, Oregon Laws
2021, for the biennium ending June  30, 2023, for self-sufficiency programs, is increased by
$26,601,216 to implement the requirements of section 31 of this 2022 Act.
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 26
CAPTIONS
SECTION 33. The unit captions used in this 2022 Act are provided  only for the conven-
ience of the reader and do not become part of the statutory law of  this state or express any
legislative intent in the enactment of this 2022 Act.
EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 34. This 2022 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2022 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House February 28, 2022
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate March 2, 2022
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2022
..................................................................................
Shemia Fagan, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 4005 (HB 4005-B) Page 27